North Carolina, session 2025, HB1216.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1.(a) Chapter 116 of the General Statutes is amended by adding a new
Article to read:
"Article 34A.
*H1216-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
"John Rollins Scholarship Protection Act.
"§ 116-284. Title of Article.
This Article shall be known and may be cited as the "John Rollins Scholarship Protection
Act."
"§ 116-285. Definitions.
The following definitions shall apply in this Article:
(1) Institutional financial aid. – All grants, scholarships, tuition waivers, and other
forms of financial assistance provided to a student based on need or merit by
a public institution of higher education. Institutional financial aid does not
include loans or funds related to work-study programs.
(2) Private scholarship. – A scholarship awarded by a private, nongovernmental
entity, including a business, a private foundation, a nonprofit organization, or
a service group, from funds that are not State funds or federal funds to a
student to enroll at a public institution of higher education. A private
scholarship does not include any of the following:
a. An award of State funds administered by a private organization,
including funds awarded pursuant to the North Carolina Patriot Star
Family Scholarship Program.
b. An award of non-State funds by a private organization, including an
alumni association or foundation, that (i) is affiliated with a public
institution of higher education and (ii) requests the assistance of the
public institution of higher education in selecting the recipient of the
award.
(3) Public institution of higher education. – A community college located in this
State or a postsecondary constituent institution of The University of North
Carolina.
(4) Student. – A person enrolled at a public institution of higher education.
"§ 116-286. No reduction of institutional financial aid.
(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, a public institution of
higher education shall not reduce the institutional financial aid of a student due to that student's
receipt of a private scholarship.
(b) The Board of Governors of The University of North Carolina and the State Board of
Community Colleges shall each adopt a policy to enforce the requirements of subsection (a) of
this section at public institutions of higher education. At a minimum, the policy shall require each
public institution of higher education to report to the relevant governing board on the following
information for each academic year:
(1) The cost of attendance for the public institution of higher education.
(2) The average institutional financial aid given to students with private
scholarships compared to those without private scholarships.
(c) No later than March 15 of each year, the Board of Governors shall report the
information provided pursuant to subsection (b) of this section to the Joint Legislative Education
Oversight Committee."
SECTION 1.(b) Part 2 of Article 3 of Chapter 115D of the General Statutes is
amended by adding the following new section to read:
"§ 115D-40.4. No reduction of institutional financial aid.
The State Board of Community Colleges and each community college shall comply with the
provisions of G.S. 116-286 to ensure that the institutional financial aid provided to a student is
not reduced due to the student's receipt of a private scholarship."
SECTION 2.(a) There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Board of
Governors of The University of North Carolina the sum of one hundred sixty thousand dollars
($160,000) in recurring funds beginning in the 2026-2027 fiscal year to be allocated to
Page 2 House Bill 1216-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
constituent institutions of The University of North Carolina based on enrollment to increase funds
available for financial aid to students.
SECTION 2.(b) There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Community
Colleges System Office the sum of five hundred eighty thousand dollars ($580,000) in recurring
funds beginning in the 2026-2027 fiscal year to be allocated to community colleges based on
enrollment to increase funds available for financial aid to students.
SECTION 2.(c) This section becomes effective July 1, 2026.
SECTION 3. Except as otherwise provided, this act is effective when it becomes law
and applies beginning with scholarships awarded in the 2027-2028 academic year.
House Bill 1216-First Edition Page 3